District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, that this
act may be cited as the “Licensing for Accountability of Management of Properties (LAMP)
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Part O of subchapter I-B of Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia
Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section heading to read as follows:
"§ 47-2853.183a. Licensure of property management firms.”.
(b) A new section 47-2853.183a is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2853.183a. Licensure of property management firms.
“(a) No firm, franchise, partnership, association, or corporation that provides property
management services, including an individual who is a property manager who employs another
individual as a property manager, shall operate in the District without a property management
firm license.

“(b) To obtain a property management firm license, an applicant must demonstrate to the
Mayor that:
“(1) The firm is licensed pursuant to applicable District and federal laws;
“(2) Every member, partner, trustee, or officer who is engaged in property
management activities for the firm is licensed as a property manager;
“(3) The firm has a designated lead property manager for each property at which
it provides property management services; and
“(4) Every employee who will render professional services on behalf of the firm
holds a valid license or certificate issued by the Real Estate Commission.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(l)).